src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Meänkieli verbs

!! This file documents [`affixes/verbs.lexc`, the file for Meänkieli verb morphology](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)  


!! ## Overview over the continuation classes

!! ### Overview over the Regular verbs
!!  * v1 = antaa; sanoa:sano
!!  * v1_tietaa = tietää:ti
!!  * v1_odd = tapahtua>tapahtunnu (odd-syll-stem), other forms like v1
!!  * v2_ata = masinata:masina (+^A i Sg3, InfMa+Ade masinaamala)
!!  * v2_ata_odd = huomata, tryykätä:tryykkä (+^A i Sg3, InfMa+Ade huomaamalla)!!  * v2_uta = leipota:leippo (+^A^A i Sg3)
!!  * v2 = continuationlexicon for v2_ata, v2_ata_odd and v2_uta
!!  * v3 = myyta:myy
!!  * v3_j = viejä, saaja
!!  * v4 = nousta; tulla:tul
!!  * v4_3la = varjela, varjelee
!!  * v4_4lla = ajatella, ajattellee
!!  * v5 = tarvita:tarv
!!  * v6 = paeta:pake
!!  * v_vanheta = vanheta
!!  * vx = unassigned

!! ### Overview over the Irregular verbs
!!  * OLLA = olla:olla 
!!  * v3_kaya = käyä:kä
!!  * v3_nahha = nähhä:nä
!!  * v3_tehha = tehhä:te
!!  * v3_jua ! Stem ju-, short inf, otherwise like v3_j 
!!  * v3_syä ! Stem sy-, short inf, otherwise like v3_j

!! ## The verb lexica themselves


LEXICON vx
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** pointing to *v1*
v1 ; ! vx

!! Irregular verbs

LEXICON OLLA !!≈ * **@CODE@**
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** olla-paradigm
+V+Inf:olla KK ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:olen K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:olet K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:oon K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:olema K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:oletta K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:oon K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Use/NG:ovva K ; ! CHECK ELINA
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:ovat K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:olin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:olit K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:oli K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:olima K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:olitta K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:oli K ; !! CHECK ELINA fler former?

+V+Act+Cond:olis 2cond ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:olis%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:olis%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:olis%>iv^A K ;


! tsekkaa loput olla-muodot, ne on ottetu fkv-tiedostosta.
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:olhaan K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:olthiin K ;  
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:ollu K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:olhee ptc_obl ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:ollu K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:oltu K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:ollut K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:oltava K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:oltavat K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl:olheet K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:olisi K ;
+V+Act+PrsPrc+Der+Der/A+A:olleeva x3 ; !??
+V+Act+PrsPrc:ole%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Der+Der/A+A:oltava x3 ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:ole K ;

! These are standard Finnish forms marked as Err/Orth.
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:on K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Err/Orth:olemme K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Err/Orth:olette K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:ollut K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg+Err/Orth:ollut K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:ollee ptc_obl ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl+Err/Orth:olleet K ;

+V+InfE+Ins:ollen K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:ollessa K ;
+V+InfMa:ole 3infcase ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:ole%>^HMET2mh^A^An K ; 

! ! Derivation
+V+Der+Der/minen:olemi nen ;

LEXICON NEG 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** negation verb
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Sg1:en NEGK ;
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Sg2:en NEGK ;
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Sg3:ei NEGK ;
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Pl1:emmä NEGK ;
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Pl2:että NEGK ;
+V+Neg+Act+Prs+Pl3:ei NEGK ;

+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg2:älä # ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl2:älkää # ;

!! Regular verbs

LEXICON v1_otta
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** lexicon for otta
:otta v1_odd ; ! korrekt
+Err/Orth:oitta v1 ; ! finska

LEXICON v1_tietaa 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** lexicon for tietää
+V+Inf:et%>^A^A KK ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:^A%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:^A%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:e%>t^A^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:^A%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:^A%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:et%>^Av^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:et%>^Av^At K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:e%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:e%>t^A K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:es%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:es%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:es%>i3 K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:es%>i3m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:es%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:es%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:es%>i3v^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:es%>i3v^At K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:e%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:e%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%^WG%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:e%>si4n K ; ! 
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:e%>si4t K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:es K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:e%>si4mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:e%>si4tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:e%>si4t K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:e%>si4v^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg:e%>i4si K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:e%>tt^A%>i4s K ; 

+V+Inf+Tra:e%>^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:et%>^Aen K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:et%>^Aess^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:et%^Am^HMET2h^A^An K ; ! a
+V+InfMa+Ill:et%^Amh^A^An K ; ! a 
+V+InfMa+Ill:et%>h^V^Vn K ; !tiethään
+V+InfMa+Ine:et%>^Am^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:et%>^Am^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:et%>^Am^All^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Abe:et%>^Am^Att^A K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:e%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:e%>tt^Av^A x3 ; 

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:e%>^N^U K ; !variantform
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:et%>^A^N^U K ; 
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:e%>hneet K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:e%>nheet K ; !HÄR CHECK HMET2
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:et%>^Ahneet K ; !variantform
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:et%>^Anheet K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:e%>tt^U K ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:e%>t^Ut K ; 

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:ä%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:ä%>k^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:ä%>kh^O^Ot # ;

! ! Derivation
+V+Der+Der/minen+N:mi xnen ;

LEXICON v1  !!≈ * **@CODE@** sanoa, lukea, antaa 
+V+Inf:%>^A KK ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:^WG%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:^WG%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>^V K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:^WG%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:^WG%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%^WG K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:%^AE%^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%^WG%>t^A K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:^WG%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:^WG%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ; ! antoi, äänesti, pieksi
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i8 K ; ! anto, äänesti, pieksi !CHECK vilka??
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:^WG%>i3m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:^WG%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^WG%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3v^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3v^At K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^AE%^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:%^AE%^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%^WG%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i4sin K ; 
+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>sin K ; !variantform
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>s K ;
!+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i4si K ; 
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i4simm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>simm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i4sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>sitt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i4siv^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>sit K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>siv^A K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%^AE%^WG%>tt^A%>i4s K ; 
+V+Pass+Cond:%^AE%^WG%>tt^A%>s K ; 
+V+Act+Cond+ConNeg:%>i4si K ;

+V+Inf+Tra:%>^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:%>en K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>ess^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>^HMET2mh^A^An K ; ! also hm but first just for two-syll (position 4); antahmaan
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>mh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^Vn K ; !isthuun, seishoon, laulhaan
+V+InfMa+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^Vn K ; !lauhlaan
+V+InfMa+Ine:%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:%>m^All^A K ; !TODO flytta ut så att inte v1_odd får!
+V+InfMa+Abe:%>m^Att^A K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:^AE^WG%>tt^Av^A x3 ; 

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^N^U K ; !CHECK EK hur göra med detta?
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>^Nhee x3_oblique ; 
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>n^HMET2%>heet K;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^AE^WG%>tt^U K ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^AE^WG%>tt^Ut K ; 

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:^WG # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>k^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;


! ! Derivation
+V+Der+Der/minen+N:mi xnen ;

LEXICON v1_odd  !!≈ * **@CODE@** käsittää>käsittänny osv 
v1 ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^N^U K ; 
+V+InfMa+Ade:%>m^Al^A K ;  
