src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
olla: OLLA ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
ei: NEG ;    !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
juumaa:juuma v1 ;
luikahtaa:luikahta v1 ;
ilahtaa:ilahta v1 ;
kulpahtaa:kulpahta v1 ;
tussahtaa:tussahta v1 ;
uskaltaa:uskalta v1 ;
lauhentaa:lauhenta v1 ;
kehnontaa:kehnonta v1 ;
kapertaa:kaperta v1 ;
paljastaa:paljasta v1 ;
tirastaa:tirasta v1 ;
luikistaa:luikista v1 ;
kopristaa:koprista v1 ;
puinostaa:puinosta v1 ;
hellustaa:hellusta v1 ;
moksustaa:moksusta v1 ;
jauhattaa:jauhatta v1 ;
kasvattaa:kasvatta v1 ;
vaaittaa:vaaitta v1 ;
toittaa:toitta v1 ;
kahvittaa:kahvitta v1 ;
virhaottaa:virhaotta v1 ;
ehottaa:ehotta v1 ;
kirjottaa:kirj v1_otta ;
allekirjottaa:alle#kirj v1_otta ;
sekottaa:sekotta v1 ;
nilottaa:nilotta v1 ;
punottaa:punotta v1 ;
vistottaa:vistotta v1 ;
paauttaa:paautta v1 ;
kimhauttaa:kimhautta v1 ;
keijauttaa:keijautta v1 ;
klipsauttaa:klipsautta v1 ;
lauhuttaa:lauhutta v1 ;
maiskuttaa:maiskutta v1 ;
piukuttaa:piukutta v1 ;
vierainuttaa:vierainutta v1 ;
jurruttaa:jurrutta v1 ;
ootatuttaa:ootatutta v1 ;
istuttaa:istutta v1 ;
viruuttaa:viruutta v1 ;
koskea:koske v1 ;
rahnikoittea:rahnikoitte v1 ;
klekkaroittea:klekkaroitte v1 ;
nuhjia:nuhji vx ;
narhkia:narhki vx ;
lakkia:lakki vx ;
puikkia:puikki vx ;
hankkia:hankki vx ;
tookkia:tookki vx ;
kukkia:kukki vx ;
tukkia:tukki vx ;
onkia:onki vx ;
junkia:junki vx ;
loiskia:loiski vx ;
talskia:talski vx ;
puoskia:puoski vx ;
latkia:latki vx ;
muotkia:muotki vx ;
sukia:suki vx ;
juhlia:juhli vx ;
lohmia:lohmi vx ;
omia:omi vx ;
lohnia:lohni vx ;
koinia:koini vx ;
vounia:vouni vx ;
kapia:kapi vx ;
kaappia:kaappi vx ;
oppia:oppi vx ;
kurppia:kurppi vx ;
muhria:muhri vx ;
koiria:koiri vx ;
kauria:kauri vx ;
puheksia:puheksi vx ;
lueksia:lueksi vx ;
kuksia:kuksi vx ;
kosia:kosi vx ;
trumpsia:trumpsi vx ;
kropsia:kropsi vx ;
parsia:parsi vx ;
paatsia:paatsi vx ;
praatia:praati vx ;
kaehtia:kaehti vx ;
lujehtia:lujehti vx ;
juolehtia:juolehti vx ;
ahnehtia:ahnehti vx ;
murehtia:murehti vx ;
tarvehtia:tarvehti vx ;
pohtia:pohti vx ;
luntia:lunti vx ;
jaustia:jausti vx ;
nutia:nuti vx ;
tulvia:tulvi vx ;
karvia:karvi vx ;
rikkoa:rikko v1 ;
ruopoa:ruopo v1 ;
neuoa:neuo v1 ;
torkkua:torkku v1 ;
vaipua:vaipu v1 ;
tapahtua:tapahtu v1_odd ;
tuulehtua:tuulehtu v1 ;
kappeentua:kappeentu v1 ;
alkkuholiseeraintua:alkkuholiseeraintu v1 ;
kessuintua:kessuintu v1 ;
kitsastua:kitsastu v1 ;
ruostua:ruostu v1 ;
haavottua:haavottu v1 ;
särkeä:särke vx ;
itkeä:itke vx ;
villitteä:villitte vx ;
kömpelöitteä:kömpelöitte vx ;
vetelöitteä:vetelöitte vx ;
kipinöitteä:kipinöitte vx ;
kliisteröitteä:kliisteröitte vx ;
ikävöitteä:ikävöitte vx ;
viiä:vii vx ;
vötkiä:vötki v1 ;
vetelehtiä:vetelehti vx ;
märehtiä:märehti vx ;
tervehtiä:tervehti vx ;
vyhtiä:vyhti vx ;
plänttiä:pläntti vx ;
nirviä:nirvi vx ;
veelä:veel vx ;
läikkyä:läikky v1 ;
liepeentyä:liepeenty v1 ;
kryttäintyä:kryttäinty v1 ;
syntyä:synty v1_odd ;
tyyntyä:tyynty v1_odd ;
järjestyä:järjesty v1_odd ;
päistyä:päisty v1 ;
tietää:ti v1_tietaa ;
myhähtää:myhähtä v1 ;
lähentää:lähentä v1 ;
ymmärtää:ymmärtä v1_odd ;
hämärtää:hämärtä v1_odd ;
lähestää:lähestä v1_odd ;
järjestää:järjestä v1_odd ;
minestää:minestä v1_odd ;
äänestää:äänestä v1_odd ;
telvestää:telvestä v1_odd ;
tihistää:tihistä v1_odd ;
lyhistää:lyhistä v1_odd ;
prytiistää:prytiistä v1_odd ;
pikistää:pikistä v1_odd ;
tirkistää:tirkistä v1_odd ;
helistää:helistä v1_odd ;
kilistää:kilistä v1_odd ;
vilistää:vilistä v1_odd ;
pyllistää:pyllistä v1_odd ;
mällistää:mällistä v1_odd ;
ylistää:ylistä v1_odd ;
jälistää:jälistä v1_odd ;
välistää:välistä v1_odd ;
pölistää:pölistä v1_odd ;
tyrmistää:tyrmistä v1_odd ;
läämistää:läämistä v1_odd ;
jänistää:jänistä v1_odd ;
kirristää:kirristä v1 ;
tehettää:tehettä v1_odd ;
lähettää:lähettä v1_odd ;
iljettää:iljettä v1_odd ;
iskettää:iskettä v1_odd ;
itkettää:itkettä v1_odd ;
imettää:imettä v1_odd ;
pyhittää:pyhittä v1_odd ;
piittää:piittä v1 ;
kirsittää:kirsittä v1_odd ;
käsittää:käsittä v1_odd ;
kirttää:kirttä v1 ;
lähennyttää:lähennyttä v1 ;
römhäyttää:römhäyttä v1 ;
lähättää:lähättä v1_odd ;
mököttää:mököttä v1 ;
lyöttää:lyöttä v1_odd ;
vyöttää:vyöttä v1_odd ;
uurtaa:uurta vx ;
kopittaa:kopitta vx ;
verottaa:verotta vx ;
havattea:havatte v1_odd ;
osottaa:osotta v1_odd ; 
säilyttää:säilyttä v1_odd ;
julistaa:julista v1_odd ;
